Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1101
Preventing Lethal Agricultural and National Threats Act, how cited.

Sections 2-1101 to 2-1105 shall be known and may be cited as the Preventing Lethal Agricultural and National Threats Act.

Laws 2026, LB1096, § 1.
July 18, 2026